New York, session 2025-2026, S3505.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known as the "Defund Municipalities that 2 Defund the Police Act". 3 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 184 to read 4 as follows: 5 § 184. Defund municipalities that defund the police act. 1. As used in 6 this section, "defunding municipality" shall mean a political subdivi- 7 sion, including counties, cities, towns and villages, that: 8 (a) abolishes or disbands the police department with no intention of 9 reconstituting such jurisdiction's police department; or 10 (b) significantly reduces the police department's budget without real- 11 locating a portion of that money to any other community-policing 12 program, provided, that the jurisdiction did not face a significant 13 decrease in revenues in the previous fiscal year. 14 2. The director of the division of budget shall withhold an amount of 15 state funding that the defunding municipality receives from the state in 16 accordance with subdivision three of this section. The director of the 17 division of budget shall discontinue and reverse any withholdings made 18 pursuant to this section upon a determination by the director that the 19 municipality no longer qualifies as a defunding municipality under 20 subdivision one of this section. 21 3. The amount withheld from the defunding municipality shall be an 22 amount equal to the percentage reduction, exclusive of funds diverted 23 for any other community-policing programs, that the defunding munici- 24 pality reduces its police department budget by. 25 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05365-01-5